Utah statutes.
16-6a-910.   Notice to voting members of indemnification of director.
(1)  If a nonprofit corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to a director
under this part in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the
nonprofit corporation, the nonprofit corporation shall give written notice of
the indemnification or advance to the voting members with or before the notice
of the next voting members' meeting.
(2)  If the next voting member action after the indemnification or advance is
taken without a meeting at the instigation of the board of directors, the
notice shall be given to the voting members at or before the time the first
voting member signs a writing consenting to the action.
